Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 81. General Provisions.

Cross references. —

For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see AS 12.47. For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.

Collateral references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d, Criminal Law, §§ 19-131

40 Am. Jur. 2d, Homicide, § 1 et seq.

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Homicide, §§ 179-190.

22 C.J.S., Criminal Law, §§ 12-16, 31, 37-46, 56-61, 81-88, 90-96, 109-127

40 C.J.S., Homicide, §§ 101-138.